Utah statutes.
48-2a-404.   Contributions by general partners.
A general partner of a limited partnership may make contributions to the
partnership and share in the profits and losses of, and in distributions from,
the limited partnership as a general partner.  A general partner also may make
contributions to and share in profits, losses, and distributions as a limited
partner.  A person who is both a general partner and a limited partner has the
rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of a
general partner and, except as provided in the partnership agreement, also has
the rights and powers, and is subject to the restrictions and liabilities, of
a limited partner to the extent of his participation in the partnership as a
limited partner.
